South Dakota, session 2026, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 45-6B-3 be AMENDED:
45-6B-3. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Abandoned mined lands," lands that were mined for noncoal minerals and
materials and for which there is no continuing reclamation responsibility or
responsibility for other remedial action under state or federal laws;
(2) "Affected land," land from:
(a) From which overburden is to be or has been removed and land upon;
(b) Upon which overburden, waste rock, mine spoil, or mill tailings is to be or
has been deposited; land which;
(c) Which is disturbed by the building of access roads, railroad loops,
warehouses, storage areas, or other support facilities for the purpose of
mining or milling; and land affected and
(d) Which is affected by surface subsidence, unstable slopes, and other surface
effects caused by underground mine workings;
(3)(2) "Aquifer," a water-bearing bed or stratum of permeable rock, sand, or gravel
capable of yielding usable quantities of water to wells or springs;
(4)(3) "Black Hills," Lawrence County south of Interstate Highway 90, Meade County west
and south of Interstate Highway 90, and Pennington and Custer Counties west of
South Dakota Highway 79, and Fall River County north of United States Highway
18 from the Wyoming border to Edgemont, then north of the Cheyenne River from
Edgemont to state Highway 79;
(5)(4) "Board," the Board of Minerals and Environment;
(6)(5) "Department," the Department of Environment Agriculture and Natural Resources;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 2 1273
(7)(6) "Development," the work performed in relation to a deposit, following the
exploration required to prove minerals are in existence in commercial quantities
but before production activities, aimed at preparing the site for mining, defining
further the ore deposit by drilling or other means, conducting pilot plant operations,
and constructing roads or ancillary facilities;
(8) "Life of the mine permit," a permit to conduct a mining operation which is in effect
if:(a) An operator continues to engage in the extraction of minerals and
complies with the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Mineral reserves are shown by the operator to remain in the mining
operation and the operator plans to, or does, temporarily cease production
for one hundred eighty days or more if the operator files a notice thereof
with the board stating the reasons for nonproduction, a plan for ceasing
production for one hundred eighty days or more if the operator files a notice
thereof with the board stating the reasons for nonproduction, a plan for the
resumption of production, and the measures taken to comply with
reclamation and other necessary activities as established by the board to
maintain the mine in a nonproducing state. The requirement of a notice of
temporary cessation does not apply to operators who resume operating
within one year and have included, in their permit applications, a statement
following the exploration required to prove minerals are in existence in that
the affected lands are to be used for less than one hundred eighty days per
year;
(c) Production is resumed within five years of the date production ended, or
the operator files a report requesting an extension of the period of
temporary cessation of production with the board stating the reasons for
the continuation of nonproduction and those factors necessary to, and the
operator's plans for, resumption of production. A temporary cessation of
production may not be continued for more than ten years without
terminating the operation and fully complying with the reclamation
requirements of this chapter.
A life of the mine permit includes that period of time after cessation of production
necessary to complete reclamation of affected lands, until the board
releases, in writing, the operator from further reclamation obligations
regarding the affected land, declares the mining operation terminated, and
releases the surety thereon
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 3 1273
(7) "Large-scale mine," a mine permitted under this chapter that is:
(a) An in situ mining operation;
(b) A mining operation that employs a cyanide leaching or other chemical or
biological leaching process to extract minerals from ore;
(c) An operation that affects more than ten acres, excluding access roads; or
(d) An operation that extracts more than twenty-five thousand tons of ore or
overburden per calendar year;
(8) "Life of the mine," a period of time:
(a) In which the operator extracts minerals;
(b) Which includes any temporary cessation of production, as described in
sections 6 7 and 7 8 of this Act; and
(c) Which includes reclamation after production ceases;
(9) "Milling," the beneficiation of a mined material from its natural occurrence in ore;
(10) "Mineral," a substance with economic value, whether organic or inorganic, that
which can be extracted from the earth, other than the following: water, oil, or gas,
sand, gravel, or rock to be crushed and used in construction, pegmatite minerals,
or limestone, sand, gypsum, shale, or iron ore used in the process of making
cement;
(11) "Mining operation," the development or extraction of a mineral from its natural
occurrence on affected land. The term includes surface mining and surface
operation, in situ mining, the reprocessing of tailings piles, the disposal of refuse
from underground mining, milling and processing located on the land described in
the application for a mining permit, and stand-alone milling and processing facilities
utilizing chemical or biological leaching agents. The term does not include
extraction of sand, gravel, or rock to be crushed and used in construction,
exploration activities, bulk sampling, the exploration and extraction of natural
petroleum in a liquid or gaseous state by means of wells or pipe, borrow excavation
for embankments, or the extraction of geothermal resources;
(12) "Operator," any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or
corporation or any department, division, or agency of federal, state, county, or
municipal government engaged in or controlling a mining operation;
(13) "Overburden," all of the earth and other materials which that are disturbed or
removed, in the original state, or as it exists after removal from its natural state
in the process of surface mining;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 4 1273
(14) "Reclamation," the employment during and after a mining operation of procedures
reasonably designed to minimize as much as practicable the disruption from the
mining operation and to provide for the rehabilitation of affected land through the
rehabilitation of plant cover, soil stability, water resources, or other measures
appropriate to the subsequent beneficial use of such the mined and reclaimed
lands;
(15) "Surface mining," the mining of minerals by removing the overburden lying above
such the mineral deposits and mining directly from the deposits thereby exposed.
The term includes mining directly from such the deposits where there is no
overburden and such practices as practices including open cut mining, open pit
mining, strip mining, placer mining, quarrying, and dredging;
(16) "Surface mining disturbed" land," land from ground:
(a) From which overburden has been removed, land upon;
(b) Upon which overburden, waste rock, mine spoil, or mill tailings have has
been deposited, land mined which;
(c) That is mined and has no overburden, heap leach pads, and;
(d) On which a heap lead pad is located process ponds; and
(e) On which a process pond is located; and
(17) "Tailings," the discharged valueless product of a beneficiation process.
Section 2. That § 45-6B-14 be AMENDED:
45-6B-14. The An application fee of one thousand dollars shall must accompany
the application. However, the application fee shall be fifty thousand dollars for a new large
scale precious metal, coal, or uranium mine permit If the application is for a new large-
scale mine permit, the fee is fifty thousand dollars. The application fee for an amendment
to an existing large scale precious metal, coal, or uranium large-scale mine permit shall
be is five thousand dollars.
Section 3. That § 45-6B-18 be AMENDED:
45-6B-18. At the request of the operator, the Board of Minerals and Environment
board may issue an amendment to the original permit covering additional contiguous land,
not to exceed fifteen additional acres, or making minor modifications of the terms and
conditions of the operating or reclamation plans. An application to amend a large scale
large-scale permit shall must include the application fee provided by § 45-6B-14. An
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 5 1273
application to amend a small scale small-scale permit shall must include the application
fee provided by § 45-6B-55.
For purposes of this section, "contiguous land" means land under the same
ownership that is directly adjoining or touching the permitted area.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 45-6B:
No fee or surety under this chapter may be required of any unit of state
government or any political subdivision of this state.
Section 5. That § 45-6B-53 be AMENDED:
45-6B-53. Any mining operation, other than an in situ mining operation or a
mining operation that employs a cyanide leaching or other chemical or biological leaching
process to extract minerals from ore, which affects less than ten acres, excluding access
roads, and extracts less than twenty-five thousand tons of ore or overburden per calendar
year shall be is subject to the provisions of §§ 45-6B-54 to 45-6B-63, inclusive, and are
is not required to comply with the provisions of §§ 45-6B-5 to 45-6B-7, inclusive, 45-6B-
10, 45-6B-14, or 45-6B-36.
Section 6. That § 45-6B-56 be AMENDED:
45-6B-56. Except as provided in subsection 45-6B-3(6)(b) sections 6 7 and 7 8
of this Act, the operator shall annually file on the anniversary date of the permit a notice
of intent to continue mining operations. The notice of intent shall must contain an annual
fee of fifty dollars and comply with the reporting requirements of § 45-6B-36.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 45-6B:
An operator of a mine permitted under this chapter may temporarily cease
production for one hundred eighty days or more provided the operator:
(1) Files a request with the board pursuant to section 7 8 of this Act to cease production
for one hundred eighty days or more, stating:
(a) The reasons for nonproduction; and
(b) Any proposed time to resume production;
(2) Takes measures to comply with reclamation and other necessary activities, as
established by the board, to maintain the mine in a nonproducing state; and
(3) Resumes production within five years of the date production temporarily ceased.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 6 1273
An operator is not required to file a request for temporary cessation if the operator
resumes mining within one year and has included, in the operator's permit application, a
statement that the affected lands are to be used for less than one hundred eighty days
per year.
The operator may file with the board a request for an extension of the period of
temporary cessation of production. The operator must state the reasons for the
continuation of nonproduction, and any proposed plan for resuming production.
An operator may not continue a temporary cessation of production longer than ten
five years. If production ceases for longer than ten five years, the operator must terminate
the operation and comply with the reclamation requirements of this chapter.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 45-6B:
A request to cease mining temporarily must contain the following information:
(1) The operator's name and permit number;
(2) The date of cessation of mining at each permitted site;
(3) Reasons for the cessation of mining activities; and
(4) A statement on the existing condition of the affected land, including a description
of reclamation activities that have been completed for each permitted site.
Section 9. That § 45-6B-60 be AMENDED:
45-6B-60. Any operator conducting an operation under a permit issued under
§ 45-6B-59, who has held the permit for two consecutive years or more, and who
subsequently desires to expand it to a size in excess of the limitation set forth in § 45-6B-
53, may request the conversion of his the permit by filing an application for a permit
pursuant to §§ 45-6B-5 to 45-6B-10, inclusive. However the The applicant need not supply
information, materials, and other data and undertakings previously supplied, including
any additional applicable materials provided to the Board of Minerals and Environment
board during the course of his the current operation, or resulting from the board's
inspections thereof. An application for conversion under this section must also comply with
the notice requirements of §§ 45-6B-16, 45-6B-17, and 45-6B-34, and must comply with
the surety and hearing requirements and the special, exception, critical, or unique land
provisions of §§ 45-6B-20 to 45-6B-33.8, inclusive.
Section 10. That § 45-6B-81 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 7 1273
45-6B-81. The board may promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to:
(1) Establish the procedure for filing and departmental review of mining permit
applications;
(2) Establish the procedure for amending mining permits;
(3) Establish the procedure for transfer of permits;
(4) Provide for the reclamation of mills proposed to be operated in conjunction with a
mining operation;
(5) Establish the prehearing procedure for determining the type of reclamation to be
performed on affected land;
(6) Establish the minimum requirements for each type of reclamation;
(7) Establish the reclamation activities required to be performed concurrent with
mining activity;
(8) Establish the procedure to address reclamation before or during a temporary
cessation of mining activity, pursuant to subdivision 45-6B-3(6) sections 6 7 and
7 8 of this Act;
(9) Establish the procedure for determining special, exceptional, critical, or unique
land, in accordance with § 45-6B-33;
(10) Establish the requirements for construction, operation, monitoring, and closure of
uranium and other mineral mines using in situ leach processes; and
(11) Establish the procedure for posting and monitoring financial assurance.
Section 11. That § 45-6B-87 be AMENDED:
45-6B-87. Nothing in this chapter relieves the holder of any large-scale gold or
silver surface mining permit from any of the requirements of the Clean Air Act of 1955, as
amended to January 1, 2011, the Clean Water Act of 1977, as amended to January 1,
2011, the South Dakota Air Quality Act (chapter 34A-1), the Federal Water Pollution
Control Act of 1972, as amended to January 1, 2011, the Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L.
93-523), as amended to January 1, 2011, the Mine Safety and Health Administration
regulations (30 C.F.R. Part 3830), as amended to January 1, 2011, United States Forest
Service surface mining and exploration reclamation requirements (43 C.F.R., page 228),
as amended to January 1, 2011, Bureau of Land Management mining and exploration
requirements (43 C.F.R. Part 3800), as amended to January 1, 2011, the Mined Land
Reclamation Act (this chapter), the regulated substance discharges statutes in chapter
34A-12, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended to January 1,
2011, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 8 1273
1980 (P.L. 95-510), as amended to January 1, 2011, the Toxic Substance Control Act of
1976 (P.L. 94-469), as amended to January 1, 2011, Lawrence County extractive
industries ordinances, as amended to January 1, 2011, and all rules and regulations
promulgated to implement existing statutes, including rules dealing with air pollution,
control of visible emissions, open burning, control of particulate emissions, control of sulfur
compound emissions, new source performance standards, standards of performance for
storage vessels of petroleum liquids, air standards, spill control plans, buried tanks, water
pollution, public water systems, and dredge and fill permit requirements.
Section 12. That § 45-6B-93 be AMENDED:
45-6B-93. Any operator of a large-scale gold or silver surface mining operation
shall submit an annual report by January first of each year including and shall make an
oral presentation to the Board of Minerals and Environment board explaining the
information in the written annual report. The annual report shall must include the following
information:
(1) The total and previous year's amount of affected land;
(2) The total and previous year's amount of surface mining disturbed land;
(3) The total and previous year's amount of land that has undergone interim
reclamation;
(4) The total and previous year's amount of land that has undergone final reclamation
and which meets the required post-mining land use;
(5) The total and previous year's amount of land that has undergone final reclamation
but which does not meet the required post-mining land use;
(6) The total amount of groundwater withdrawn during the previous year;
(7) The total amount of surface water withdrawn during the previous year;
(8) The total amount of ore mined during the previous year;
(9) The total amount of ore processed during the previous year;
(10) The total amount of waste rock mined during the previous year;
(11) The total amount of gold and silver minerals produced during the previous year;
(12) The total amount of cyanide used during the previous year; and
(13) A brief discussion of the coming year's operational plans including any anticipated
revisions that might require department or board approval.
Section 13. That § 45-6B-94 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 9 1273
45-6B-94. The Legislature of South Dakota finds that protection of the
environment requires regulation of the total amount of land that can be disturbed by
surface mining by large-scale gold or silver surface mining operations at any given time.
Section 14. That § 45-6B-95 be AMENDED:
45-6B-95. The board may not issue a permit for a new large-scale gold or silver
surface mining operation if the proposed surface mining disturbed lands under that permit
shall exceed exceeds three hundred twenty acres. Nor may the board issue new permits
or amendments to existing permits for new large-scale gold or silver surface mining
operations for expanded acres of surface mining disturbed lands until reclamation has
been performed in accord with § 45-6B-97.
Section 15. That § 45-6B-97 be AMENDED:
45-6B-97. New permits or amendments to existing permits for expanded acres of
surface mining disturbed land for operations referred to in §§ 45-6B-95 and 45-6B-96
§ 45-6B-95 may be issued only if the applicant has performed reclamation on an equal
number of acres of permitted affected land, or has agreed not to disturb an equal acreage
of permitted affected land, or, with consent of the board, has performed or agrees to
perform reclamation concurrently with disturbance of an equal number of acres of
previously mined land inside or outside a permit area boundary. For purpose purposes of
§§ 45-6B-94 to 45-6B-99, inclusive only, reclamation is performed when the operator
completes required grading, topsoil replacement, erosion, and drainage control and any
required planting and seeding that the department finds meets the requirements of the
approved reclamation plan. To qualify for reclamation credit, reclamation activities shall
must have been conducted after the operator was granted the original large-scale gold or
silver surface mining permit and surety for the reclaimed acres of affected land shall must
not have been released prior to November 19, 1992. With consent of the board, a
large-scale gold or silver surface mining operator may assign reclamation credit acreage
to another large-scale gold or silver surface mining operator.
Section 16. That § 45-6C-3 be AMENDED:
45-6C-3. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Affected land," the surface area, surface water, and groundwater disturbed by
reason of the building of access roads or trails, leveling drill sites, storage areas,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 10 1273
containment ponds, or other support facilities for the purpose of exploration,
including the land affected by surface subsidence;
(2) "Aquifer," a water bearing bed or stratum of permeable rock, sand, or gravel
capable of yielding usable quantities of water to wells or springs;
(3) "Board," the Board of Minerals and Environment;
(4) "Bulk samples," the removal of not more than five thousand tons of mineralized
material by means of a shaft, adit, or test open pit to determine the economic
feasibility of conducting a mining operation;
(5) "Department," the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources;
(6) "Exploration operation," the act of searching for or investigating a mineral deposit,
including by sinking shafts, tunneling, drilling test holes, digging pits or cuts, or
other works for the purpose of extracting samples, including bulk samples, prior to
commencement of development or extraction operations, and test facilities and
testing to prove the commercial grade of a mineralized deposit. The term does not
include those activities which that cause very little or no surface disturbance, such
as exploration by auger or drill of test holes of less than fifty feet in depth and less
than seven inches in diameter for sand, limestone, gypsum, shale, or iron ore for
use in the process of making cement or nonexplosive seismic energy sources,
airborne surveys and photographs, augered bentonite or augered construction
aggregate test holes of less than fifty feet in depth when accomplished in
conformance with §§ 45-6C-28 and 45-6C-32, use of instruments or devices which
are hand carried or otherwise transported over the surface to make magnetic,
radioactive, or other tests and measurements, boundary or claim surveying,
location work, annual assessment work required to maintain the validity of a
mineral claim or any other work which causes no greater land disturbance than is
caused by ordinary lawful use of the land by persons not exploring for mineral
deposits;
(7) "Mineral," any substance with economic value, whether organic or inorganic, that
can be extracted from the earth, including oil and gas, but excluding uranium and
water other than water, oil, or gas;
(8) "Operator," any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association or
corporation, or any department, division, or agency of federal, state, county, or
municipal government engaged in or controlling a mineral exploration operation;
(9) "Reclamation," the employment during and after an exploration operation of
procedures reasonably designed to minimize the disruption from the exploration
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1273A 11 1273
operation and to provide for the rehabilitation of plant cover, soil stability, water
resources, or other measures appropriate to the subsequent beneficial use of such
the explored land; and
(10) "Test hole," a well, core hole, core test, observation well, or other well drilled from
the surface to determine the presence of mineral, mineral resource, ore, coal, or
rock unit, or to obtain geological or geophysical information or other subsurface
data, including holes drilled for purposes of seismic survey, but excluding drilling
in conjunction with mining or quarry operations and structural foundations and oil
and gas wells regulated pursuant to chapter 45-9.
Section 17. That chapter 45-6 be REPEALED.
Section 18. That § 45-6B-96 be REPEALED.
The board may not issue new permits to or amendments to existing permits for
presently operating large-scale gold or silver surface mining operations for expanded acres
of surface mining disturbed lands until reclamation has been performed in accord with
§ 45-6B-97, except that presently operating large-scale gold or silver surface mining
operations are not subject to this provision until the permitted acres of surface mining
disturbed lands total two hundred acres more per each individual permit than its permitted
surface mining disturbed land total acreage as of January 1, 1992.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.